Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Alternative energy resource" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(2) "Alternative jet fuel" means a fuel that can be blended and used with conventional petroleum jet fuels without the need to modify aircraft engines and existing fuel distribution infrastructure and that meets the greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirements that apply to biomass-derived fuels as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. "Alternative jet fuel" includes jet fuels derived from coprocessed feedstocks at a conventional petroleum refinery.

(3) "Applicant" means a person applying to the department of commerce for designation of a development project as a clean energy project of statewide significance under this chapter.

(4)(a) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and supporting facilities connecting a clean energy project with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system including, but not limited to, battery energy storage communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary storage and transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages of at least 115,000 volts to connect a clean energy project to the northwest power grid.

(b) Common carrier railroads or motor vehicles are not associated facilities.

(5) "Clean energy product manufacturing facility" means a facility or a project at any facility that exclusively or primarily manufactures the following products or components primarily used by such products:

(a) Vehicles, vessels, and other modes of transportation that emit no exhaust gas from the onboard source of power, other than water vapor;

(b) Charging and fueling infrastructure for electric, hydrogen, or other types of vehicles that emit no exhaust gas from the onboard source of power, other than water vapor;

(c) Renewable or green electrolytic hydrogen, including preparing renewable or green electrolytic hydrogen for distribution as an energy carrier or manufacturing feedstock, or converting it to a green hydrogen carrier;

(d) Equipment and products used to produce energy from alternative energy resources;

(e) Equipment and products used to produce nonemitting electric generation as defined in RCW 19.405.020;

(f) Equipment and products used at storage facilities;

(g) Equipment and products used to improve energy efficiency;

(h) Semiconductors or semiconductor materials as defined in RCW 82.04.2404; and

(i) Projects or facility upgrades undertaken by emissions-intensive, trade-exposed industries as classified in RCW 70A.65.110 for which the facility can demonstrate expected reductions in overall facility greenhouse gas emissions to align with the cap trajectory under chapter 70A.65 RCW, where the project does not degrade local air quality.

(6) "Clean energy project" means the following facilities together with their associated facilities:

(a) Clean energy product manufacturing facilities;

(b) Electrical transmission facilities;

(c) Facilities to produce nonemitting electric generation or electric generation from renewable resources, as defined in RCW 19.405.020, except for:

(i) Hydroelectric generation that includes new diversions, new impoundments, new bypass reaches, or the expansion of existing reservoirs constructed after May 7, 2019, unless the diversions, bypass reaches, or reservoir expansions are necessary for the operation of a pumped storage facility that: (A) Does not conflict with existing state or federal fish recovery plans; and (B) complies with all local, state, and federal laws and regulations; and

(ii) Hydroelectric generation associated with facilities or persons that have been the subject of an enforcement action, penalty order, or settled any enforcement action or penalty order with any agreement to pay a penalty or pay for or conduct mitigation under chapter 90.48 or 77.55 RCW during the preceding 15 years that resulted in the payment of a penalty of at least $100,000 or conducting mitigation with a value of at least $100,000;

(d) Storage facilities;

(e) Facilities or projects at any facilities that exclusively or primarily process biogenic feedstocks into biofuel as defined in RCW 80.50.020;

(f) Biomass energy facilities as defined in RCW 19.405.020; or

(g) Facilities or projects at any facilities that exclusively or primarily process alternative jet fuel.

(7) "Electrical transmission facilities" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020, except excluding electrical transmission facilities that primarily or solely serve facilities that generate electricity from fossil fuels.

(8) "Fully coordinated permit process" means a comprehensive coordinated permitting assistance approach supported by a written agreement between the project proponent, the department of ecology, and the participating agencies.

(9) "Fully coordinated project" means a clean energy project subject to the fully coordinated permit process.

(10) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(11) "Green hydrogen carrier" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(12) "Overburdened community" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(13) "Permit" means any permit, license, certificate, use authorization, or other form of governmental review or approval required in order to construct, expand, or operate a project in the state of Washington.

(14) "Permit agency" means any state or local agency authorized by law to issue permits.

(15) "Project proponent" means a person, business, or any entity applying for or seeking a permit or permits in the state of Washington.

(16) "Reasonable costs" means direct and indirect expenses incurred by the department of ecology, participating agencies, or local governments in carrying out the coordinated permit process established in this chapter, including the initial assessment, environmental review, and permitting. "Reasonable costs" includes work done by agency or local government staff or consultants hired by agencies or local governments to carry out the work plan. "Reasonable costs" may also include other costs agreed to between the applicant and the department of ecology, participating agencies, or local governments.

(17) "Renewable hydrogen" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(18) "Renewable natural gas" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(19) "Renewable resource" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

(20) "Storage facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.50.020.

[ 2023 c 230 s 201.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.